Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3193.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-1 of the General Laws entitled "Causes of Action" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-1-55. Punitive damages in civil actions.
(a) In any civil action including, but not limited to, causes of action brought under chapter
7 of title 10 ("death by wrongful act"), the plaintiff may receive an award for punitive damages if
evidence is submitted showing the actions of the defendant constitute willful or wanton conduct or
that the defendant acted with reckless disregard for the health safety and welfare of persons who
foreseeably might be harmed by said reckless, willful or wanton conduct.
(b) For purposes of this section and its application to any civil action, "willful or wanton
conduct" means conduct committed which the actor knew or should have known was dangerous or
was done heedlessly and recklessly and without regard to consequences or the rights and safety of
others.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005226
========